District of Columbia statutes.
22-2102

Murder in the first degree — Placing obstructions upon or displacement of railroads.

Whoever maliciously places an obstruction upon a railroad or street railroad, or displaces or injures anything appertaining thereto, or does any other act with intent to endanger the passage of any locomotive or car, and thereby occasions the death of another, is guilty of murder in the first degree. For purposes of imprisonment following revocation of release authorized by § 24-403.01(b)(7), murder in the first degree is a Class A felony.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1321, ch. 854, § 799
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302,§ 4(b), 47 DCR 7249
Offenders convicted under this section, eligibility for furlough, see § 24-251.02.
This section is referenced in § 22-2103, § 22-3152, § 23-113, § 24-112, and § 24-251.02.
1981 Ed., § 22-2402.
1973 Ed., § 22-2402.
D.C. Law 13-302 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).